hu: Csokoládé formája: Tábla; Tömb; Lencse/pasztilla; Darabok; Kuvartür; Töret; Por; Ostya/pasztilla; Egyéb
pt-BR: Forma do chocolate: Barra/tablete; Bloco; Gotas; Pedaços; Cobertura; Nibs; Em pó; Discos/moedas; Outro
vi: Hình dạng sô cô la: Thanh/miếng; Khối; Hạt/vụn; Mảnh/viên; Couverture; Ngòi; Bột; Dạng đĩa/Feves; Khác
sk-SK: Forma čokolády: Tabuľka/blok; Blok; Pecičky/kúsky; Kusy; Kuvertúra; Drvené bôby; Prášok; Oblátky/fèves; Iné
fr: Forme du chocolat: Barre/plaque; Bloc; Pistoles/pépites; Morceaux; Couverture; Grué; Poudre; Pastilles/fèves; Autre
el: Μορφή σοκολάτας: Μπάρα/Πλάκα; Μπλοκ; Σταγόνες/Κομματάκια; Χοντρά κομμάτια; Κουβερτούρα; Nibs; Σκόνη; Δίσκοι/Πλακέτες; Άλλη
sl-SI: Oblika čokolade: Tablica/blok; Blok; Kapljice/koščki; Koščki; Kuvertura; Zdrob; Prah; Oblati/diski; Drugo
de: Schokoladenform: Tafel/Block; Block; Callets/Chips; Chunks; Kuvertüre; Nibs; Pulver; Wafers/Fèves; Sonstige
hr-HR: Oblik čokolade: Pločica/tabla; Blok; Kapljice/komadići; Komadi; Kovertura; Zrnca; Prah; Vafli / fèves; Ostalo
it: Forma di cioccolato: Tavoletta/Lastra; Blocco; Gocce; Pezzetti; Copertura; Granella; Polvere; Cialde/Fave; Altro
pl: Forma czekolady: Tabliczka / blok; Blok; Pastylki / kropelki; Kawałki; Kuwertura; Śruta kakaowa; Proszek; Krążki / pastylki; Inna
da: Chokoladeform: Plade/blok; Blok; Knapper/chips; Stykker; Couverture; Nibs; Pulver; Wafers/fèves; Andet
ko: 초콜릿 형태: 바/슬래브; 블록; 칼레트/칩; 청크; 커버처; 닙스; 분말; 웨이퍼/페브; 기타
th: รูปแบบของช็อกโกแลต: แท่ง/แผ่น; บล็อก; เม็ด/ชิป; ชิ้น; คูเวอร์เจอร์; นิบส์; ผง; เวเฟอร์/เหรียญ; อื่นๆ
es: Presentación del chocolate: Barra/bloque; Bloque; Gotas/chispas; Trozos; Cobertura; Nibs; Polvo; Obleas/fèves; Otro
fi: Suklaan muoto: Levy; Lohko; Hiput/pisarat; Palat; Kuorrutesuklaa; Nibsit; Jauhe; Napit / fevet; Muu
ro-RO: Formă de ciocolată: Baton/Tabletă; Bloc; Bănuți/Picături; Bucăți; Cuvertură; Nibs; Pudră; Napolitane/Discuri; Altele
pt-PT: Forma de chocolate: Tablete/barra; Bloco; Gotas/pepitas; Pedaços; Cobertura; Nibs; Pó; Discos/fèves; Outro
bg-BG: Форма на шоколада: Блокче/плочка; Блок; Капки/чипс; Парченца; Кувертюр; Натрошени зърна; На прах; Дискове/капки; Друго
nl: Chocolade vorm: Reep/tablet; Blok; Callets/druppels; Stukken; Couverture; Nibs; Poeder; Wafels/fèves; Anders
zh-TW: 巧克力形態: 條狀/塊狀; 磚塊狀; 巧克力豆/巧克力碎; 塊狀; 調溫巧克力; 可可碎粒; 粉狀; 圓片狀/豆狀; 其他
tr: Çikolata formu: Tablet/kalıp; Blok; Pul/damla; Parça; Kuvertür; Kakao parçacığı; Toz; Disk/pul; Diğer
ja: チョコレートの形状: 板/スラブ; ブロック; カレット/チップ; チャンク; クーベルチュール; ニブ; パウダー; ウェハー/フェーブ; その他
ru: Форма шоколада: Плитка / батончик; Блок; Каллеты / капли; Кусочки; Кувертюр; Крупка; Порошок; Диски / февы; Другое
en: Chocolate form: Bar/Slab; Block; Callets/Chips; Chunks; Couverture; Nibs; Powder; Wafers/Feves; Other
zh-CN: 巧克力形态: 块状/板状; 大块; 豆状/碎粒状; 块状; 调温巧克力; 可可碎; 粉末; 薄片/豆状; 其他
lt-LT: Šokolado forma: Plytelė / blokelis; Blokas; Lašeliai / gabaliukai; Gabalėliai; Kuvertiūras; Kakavos pupelių gabalėliai; Milteliai; Vafliai / diskai; Kita
cs: Čokoládová forma: Tabulka/blok; Blok; Pecky/kousky; Kousky; Kouvertura; Drcené boby; Prášek; Penízky/pecky; Jiné
nb: Sjokoladeform: Plate / blokk; Blokk; Knapper / dråper; Biter; Kuvertyr; Nibs; Pulver; Pletter / feves; Annen
sv: Chokladform: Kaka/block; Block; Pellets/knappar; Bitar; Kuvertyr; Nibs; Pulver; Pastiller/fèves; Annan